Utah statutes.
13-49-404.   Recovery of losses.

In addition to any other remedies, a person suffering pecuniary loss because of a violation by another person of this chapter may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction and may recover:

(1)  the greater of $500 or twice the amount of the pecuniary loss; and

(2)  court costs and reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 2012 General Session

